Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB260.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4503(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4503. Exemptions from jury duty.(a) General rule.--No person shall be exempt or excused from jury duty except the following:* * *(9) Caregivers who: (i) request to be excused;(ii) are not employed outside their home; and(iii) reside in a household with primary responsibility for the active care of a child under seven years of age or of an individual with a permanent 123456789101112131415161718 physical or intellectual disability, if the individual cannot care for the individual during the hours when the court is normally in session, and the caregivers:(A) do not have alternative care that is available to them; or(B) are unable to afford alternative care.(a.1) Caregivers.--(1) A court may require a notarized affidavit from the caregivers under subsection (a)(9) attesting to the satisfaction of the conditions specified under subsection (a)(9)(ii) and (iii).(2) Caregivers under subsection (a)(9) may be excused permanently or for a period as the court determines is necessary. If excused for a limited period, the caregivers shall, at the end of the period, be assigned to the next jury array.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0260PN0208 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718